Missouri, session 2026, HB3216.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 9.510, to read as follows:
9.510. May tenth each year is hereby designated as "Missouri River Runner
2 Day" in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate
3 events and activities to recognize the role of passenger rail in connecting Missouri
4 communities, supporting economic development, and promoting safe and reliable
5 transportation across the state.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.